Florida, session 2026, SB1464.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 1013.121, Florida Statutes, is created 19 to read: 20 1013.121âSchool food and plastic waste reduction.â 21 (1)âThe Department of Education shall develop a 3-year 22 pilot program in cooperation with the Department of Agriculture 23 and Consumer Serviceâs Farm to School program to be offered in 24 up to 10 percent of schools in any school district in this state 25 by the beginning of the 2027-2028 school year. The program must 26 include all of the following: 27 (a)âA partnership with a local nonprofit organization or 28 food bank to redistribute edible cafeteria food and divert 29 organic food waste to a composting program. 30 (b)âInstallation of a sorting system for cafeteria waste, 31 subject to legislative appropriation. 32 (c)âInstallation of a dishwashing system, with priority 33 given to schools that previously operated a dishwashing system, 34 subject to legislative appropriation. 35 (d)âElimination of single-use plastics by replacing them 36 with stainless steel reusable serving ware. 37 (2)âEach participating school district shall submit an 38 annual report to the Department of Education by the end of each 39 school year which includes all of the following: 40 (a)âTotal quantity of cafeteria waste diverted to landfill 41 or incineration. 42 (b)âTotal quantity by weight of cafeteria food donated. 43 (c)âTotal quantity by weight of organic food waste diverted 44 as animal feed or compost. 45 (d)âTotal quantity of single-use plastic items eliminated. 46 (e)âCost savings realized by the school district. 47 (f)âAny barriers encountered and recommendations for the 48 pilot program. 49 (3)âThe pilot program expires and this section is repealed 50 July 1, 2030. 51 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.